North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE XI GENERAL PROVISIONS

Section 1. [Name and boundary of state]

The name of this state shall be “North Dakota.” The state of North Dakota shall consist of all the territory included within the following boundary, to wit: Commencing at a point in the main channel of the Red River of the North, where the forty-ninth
degree of north latitude crosses the same; thence south up the main channel of the same and along the boundary line of the state of Minnesota to a point where the seventh standard parallel intersects the same; thence west along said
seventh standard parallel produced due west to a point where it intersects the twenty-seventh meridian of longitude west from Washington; thence north on said meridian to a point where it intersects the forty-ninth degree of north
latitude; thence east along said line to place of beginning.

Section 2. [Great seal]

The following described seal is hereby declared to be and hereby constituted the great seal of the state of North Dakota, to wit: A tree in the open field, the trunk of which is surrounded by three bundles of wheat; on the right a plow, anvil and sledge;
on the left, a bow crossed with three arrows, and an Indian on horseback pursuing a buffalo toward the setting sun; the foliage of the tree arched by a half circle of forty-two stars, surrounded by the motto “Liberty and Union Now
and Forever, One and Inseparable”; the words “Great Seal” at the top; the words “State of North Dakota” at the bottom; “October 1st” on the left and “1889” on the right. The seal to be two and one-half inches in diameter.

Section 3. [Waters]

All flowing streams and natural watercourses shall forever remain the property of the state for mining, irrigating and manufacturing purposes.

Section 4. [Oath or affirmation]

Members of the legislative assembly and the executive and judicial branches, except such inferior officers as may be by law exempted, before they enter on the duties of their respective offices, shall take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation:
“I do solemnly swear (or affirm as the case may be) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of North Dakota; and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of _________
according to the best of my ability, so help me God” (if an oath), (under pains and penalties of perjury) if an affirmation, and any other oath, declaration, or test may not be required as a qualification for any office or public trust.

Section 5. [Open meetings]

Unless otherwise provided by law, all meetings of public or governmental bodies, boards, bureaus, commissions, or agencies of the state or any political subdivision of the state, or organizations or agencies supported in whole or in part by public funds,
or expending public funds, shall be open to the public.

Section 6. [Open records]

Unless otherwise provided by law, all records of public or governmental bodies, boards, bureaus, commissions, or agencies of the state or any political subdivision of the state, or organizations or agencies supported in whole or in part by public funds,
or expending public funds, shall be public records, open and accessible for inspection during reasonable office hours.

Section 7. [Emergency governmental operations]

The legislative assembly, in order to ensure continuity of state and local governmental operations in periods of emergency resulting from disasters caused by enemy attack, shall have the power and immediate duty (1) to provide for prompt and temporary
succession to the powers and duties of public offices, of whatever nature and whether filled by election or appointment, the incumbents of which may become unavailable for carrying on the powers and duties of such offices, and (2)
to adopt such other measures as may be necessary and proper for ensuring the continuity of governmental operations including, but not limited to, waiver of constitutional restrictions upon the place of transaction of governmental business,
upon the calling of sessions of the legislative assembly, length of sessions, quorum and voting requirements, subjects of legislation and appropriation bill requirements, upon eligibility of legislators to hold other offices, residence
requirements for legislators, and upon expenditures, loans or donations of public moneys. In the exercise of the powers hereby conferred the legislative assembly shall in all respects conform to the requirements of this constitution
except to the extent that in the judgment of the legislative assembly so to do would be impracticable or would admit of undue delay.

Section 8. [Power of impeachment]

The house of representatives shall have the sole power of impeachment. The concurrence of a majority of all members elected shall be necessary to an impeachment.

Section 9. [Trial of impeachment]

All impeachments shall be tried by the senate. When sitting for that purpose the senators shall be upon oath or affirmation to do justice according to the law and evidence. No person shall be convicted without the concurrence of two-thirds of the members
elected. When the governor or lieutenant governor is on trial, the presiding judge of the supreme court shall preside.

Section 10. [Officers subject to impeachment]

The governor and other state and judicial officers, except county judges, justices of the peace and police magistrates, shall be liable to impeachment for habitual drunkenness, crimes, corrupt conduct, or malfeasance or misdemeanor in office, but judgment
in such cases shall not extend further than removal from office and disqualification to hold any office of trust or profit under the state. The person accused, whether convicted or acquitted, shall nevertheless be liable to indictment,
trial, judgment and punishment according to law.

Section 11. [Removal of officers not subject to impeachment]

All officers not liable to impeachment shall be subject to removal for misconduct, malfeasance, crime or misdemeanor in office, or for habitual drunkenness or gross incompetency in such manner as may be provided by law.

Section 12. [Suspension of duties between impeachment and acquittal]

No officer shall exercise the duties of his office after he shall have been impeached and before his acquittal.

Section 13. [Lieutenant governor not to try governor]

On trial of impeachment against the governor, the lieutenant governor shall not act as a member of the court.

Section 14. [Service of copy of impeachment]

No person shall be tried on impeachment before he shall have been served with a copy thereof, at least twenty days previous to the day set for trial.

Section 15. [Impeachment only once]

No person shall be liable to impeachment twice for the same offense.

Section 16. [Composition of militia]

The reserve militia of this state consists of all able-bodied individuals eighteen years of age and older residing in the state, unless exempted by the laws of the United States or of this state. The active militia is the national guard of this state
and consists of individuals who volunteer and are accepted unless exempted by the laws of the United States or of this state. An individual whose religious tenets or conscientious scruples forbid that individual to bear arms may not
be compelled to do so in times of peace, but that individual shall pay an equivalent for a personal service.

Section 17. [Organization of militia]

The militia shall be enrolled, organized, uniformed, armed and disciplined in such a manner as shall be provided by law, not incompatible with the constitution or laws of the United States.

Section 18. [Active militia]

The legislative assembly shall provide by law for the establishment of volunteer organizations of the several arms of the service, which shall be classed as active militia; and no other organized body of armed men shall be permitted to perform military
duty in this state except the army of the United States, without the proclamation of the governor of the state.

Section 19. [Officers in militia]

All militia officers shall be appointed or elected in such a manner as the legislative assembly shall provide.

Section 20. [Commissioned officers]

The commissioned officers of the militia shall be commissioned by the governor, and no commissioned officer shall be removed from office except by sentence of court-martial, pursuant to law.

Section 21. [Militia forces privileges from arrest]

The militia forces shall in all cases, except treason, felony or breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest during their attendance at musters, parades and elections of officers, and in going to and returning from the same.

Section 22. [Rights of debtors]

The right of the debtor to enjoy the comforts and necessaries of life shall be recognized by wholesome laws, exempting from forced sale to all heads of families a homestead, the value of which shall be limited and defined by law; and a reasonable amount
of personal property; the kind and value shall be fixed by law. This section shall not be construed to prevent liens against the homestead for labor done and materials furnished in the improvement thereof, in such manner as may be
prescribed by law.

Section 23. [Property rights of married women]

The real and personal property of any woman in this state, acquired before marriage, and all property to which she may, after marriage become in any manner rightfully entitled, shall be her separate property, and shall not be liable for the debts of her
husband.

Section 24. [Child labor]

The labor of children under twelve years of age, shall be prohibited in mines, factories and workshops in this state.

Section 25. [Games of chance]

The legislative assembly shall not authorize any game of chance, lottery, or gift enterprises, under any pretense, or for any purpose whatever. However, the legislative assembly shall authorize the state of North Dakota to join a multi-state lottery for
the benefit of the state of North Dakota, and, the legislative assembly may authorize by law bona fide nonprofit veterans’, charitable, educational, religious, or fraternal organizations, civic and service clubs, or such other public-spirited
organizations as it may recognize, to conduct games of chance when the entire net proceeds of such games of chance are to be devoted to educational, charitable, patriotic, fraternal, religious, or other public-spirited uses.

Section 26. [Compensation of elected officials]

The legislative, executive, and judicial branches are coequal branches of government. Elected members and officials of each branch shall receive as compensation for their services only such amounts as may be specifically set by law. Payment for necessary
expenses shall not exceed those allowed for other state employees.

Section 27. [Right to hunt, trap and fish]

Hunting, trapping, and fishing and the taking of game and fish are a valued part of our heritage and will be forever preserved for the people and managed by law and regulation for the public good.

Section 28. [Definition of marriage]

Marriage consists only of the legal union between a man and a woman. No other domestic union, however denominated, may be recognized as a marriage or given the same or substantially equivalent legal effect.

Section 29. [Right of farmers and ranchers to engage in modern farming and ranching practices]

The right of farmers and ranchers to engage in modern farming and ranching practices shall be forever guaranteed in this state. No law shall be enacted which abridges the right of farmers and ranchers to employ agricultural technology, modern livestock
production, and ranching practices.